Arkansas statutes. Title 25 State Government
Chapter 1

General Provisions

Cross References. Immunity from tort liability, §16-120-101 et seq.

Effective Dates. Acts 1999, No. 1222, § 21: Apr. 8, 1999. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Eighty-second General Assembly, that it is essential to the effective and efficient administration of the Child Care Licensing program that the responsibility for reviewing appeals be placed in the Child Care Appeal Review Panel under the Department of Human Services, as soon as possible and that this act is designed to accomplish this purpose and should be given effect immediately. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective on the date of its approval of the Governor. If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, it shall become effective on the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill. If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, it shall become effective on the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Subchapter 1

— General Provisions

A.C.R.C. Notes. Due to the enactment of subchapters 2 and 3 by Acts 1999, Nos. 1276 and 1414, the existing provisions of this chapter have been designated as subchapter 1.

Cross References. Immunity from tort liability, §16-120-101 et seq.

Effective Dates. Acts 1961, No. 487, § 4: Jan. 1, 1962.

Acts 1987, No. 895, § 3: Apr. 13, 1987. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that such access is needed by State agencies to properly and efficiently perform their duties and to access and limit the potential liability of the State of Arkansas. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1989 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 247, § 26: July 1, 1989. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Seventy-Seventh General Assembly, that the Constitution of the State of Arkansas prohibits the appropriation of funds for more than a two (2) year period; that the effectiveness of this Act on July 1, 1989 is essential to the operation of the agency for which the appropriations in this Act are provided, and that in the event of an extension of the Regular Session, the delay in the effective date of this Act beyond July 1, 1989 could work irreparable harm upon the proper administration and provision of essential governmental programs. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 1989.”

Acts 1997, No. 181, § 5: February 17, 1997. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that the present law requiring annual mission statements and activity statements by state boards and commissions does not specify the timeframe within which such reports must be filed; this act so provides; and that until this act becomes effective, confusion will exist as to when those filings are required. Therefore an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective on the date of its approval by the Governor. If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, it shall become effective on the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill. If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, it shall become effective on the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 1999, No. 1428, § 33: July 1, 1999. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Eighty-second General Assembly, that the Constitution of the State of Arkansas prohibits the appropriation of funds for more than a two (2) year period; that the effectiveness of this Act on July 1, 1999 is essential to the operation of the agency for which the appropriations in this Act are provided, and that in the event of an extension of the Regular Session, the delay in the effective date of this Act beyond July 1, 1999 could work irreparable harm upon the proper administration and provision of essential governmental programs. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 1999.”

Acts 2001, No. 221, § 7: Feb. 13, 2001. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Eighty-third General Assembly that the current incremental line-item system of budgeting is ineffective in evaluating agency performance; that to implement a replacement system in a reasonable time is a difficult task and that to delay the implementation could cause the inability to meet critical deadlines. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective on the date of its approval by the Governor. If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, it shall become effective on the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill. If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, it shall become effective on the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2001, No. 1786, § 5: Apr. 19, 2001. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the Eighty-third General Assembly that immediate clarification is needed with regard to the authority to administer funds provided to the State of Arkansas under the federal Victims of Crime Act, the Violence Against Women Act, and the Family Violence Prevention and Services Act; and that this act, in order to comply with federal law, removes state legislative restrictions on the administration of such funds where the federal government has previously enacted legislation or regulations governing the authority to administer these funds. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective on the date of its approval by the Governor. If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, it shall become effective on the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill. If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, it shall become effective on the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2009, No. 1405, § 57: Apr. 9, 2009. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the people of the State of Arkansas overwhelmingly approved the establishment of lotteries at the 2008 General Election; that the Eighty-seventh General Assembly adopted Acts 605 and 606 of 2009 that implemented lotteries and made corresponding revisions to the Arkansas Academic Challenge Scholarship Program; that this bill amends provisions of Acts 605 and 606 of 2009 pertaining to lotteries and the Arkansas Academic Challenge Scholarship Program; and that the failure to immediately implement this act will cause a reduction in lottery proceeds that will harm the educational and economic success of potential students eligible to receive scholarships under the act. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2015, No. 218, § 34: Feb. 26, 2015. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the stability of the Arkansas Scholarship Lottery is critical to the success of the Arkansas Academic Challenge Scholarship Program; that changes to the operational structure of the lottery are needed to improve the creditability and function of the lottery; and that this act is immediately necessary to ensure that the transition of lottery administration is as undisruptive as possible. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2019, No. 910, § 6346(b): July 1, 2019. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act revises the duties of certain state entities; that this act establishes new departments of the state; that these revisions impact the expenses and operations of state government; and that the sections of this act other than the two uncodified sections of this act preceding the emergency clause titled ‘Funding and classification of cabinet-level department secretaries’ and ‘Transformation and Efficiencies Act transition team’ should become effective at the beginning of the fiscal year to allow for implementation of the new provisions at the beginning of the fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and Sections 1 through 6343 of this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2019”.

25-1-101. Emergency relocation of seat of government.

Whenever due to an emergency resulting from the effects of enemy attack or the anticipated effects of a threatened enemy attack, it becomes imprudent, inexpedient, or impossible to conduct the affairs of state government at the normal location of the seat thereof in the City of Little Rock, the Governor, as often as the exigencies of the situation require, shall by proclamation declare an emergency temporary location for the seat of government at a place within or without this state which he or she may deem advisable under the circumstances. The Governor shall take any action and issue any orders which may be necessary for an orderly transition of the affairs of state government to the emergency temporary location.

The emergency temporary location shall remain as the seat of government until the General Assembly shall by law establish a new location or until the emergency is declared to be ended by the Governor and the seat of government is returned to its normal location.

During such time as the seat of government remains at the emergency temporary location, all official acts required by law to be performed at the seat of government by any officer, agency, department, or authority of this state, including the convening and meeting of the General Assembly in regular, extraordinary, or emergency session, shall be as valid and binding when performed at the emergency temporary location as if performed at the normal location of the seat of government.

The provisions of this section shall control and be supreme in the event it shall be employed, notwithstanding the provisions of any other law to the contrary or in conflict herewith.

Cross References. Emergency seat of local government, §14-14-308.

Publisher's Notes. This section, concerning state agency smoking policies, was repealed by Acts 2013, No. 1276, § 1. The section was derived from Acts 1987, No. 462, §§ 1, 2.

History.

Acts 1961, No. 487, §§ 1-3; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 5-112 — 5-114.

25-1-102. [Repealed.]

Records prepared by or in the possession of entities having potential liability for payment for services provided by or paid for in whole or part by an agency of the State of Arkansas shall be made available for inspection, review, audit, and other purposes of representatives of the State of Arkansas and its designee. This section applies to, but is not limited to, records of private health insurance carriers.

History.

Acts 1987, No. 895, § 1.

25-1-104. Access of Department of Finance and Administration to agency records.

The Revenue Division, the Division of Workforce Services, the University of Arkansas at Little Rock, the University of Arkansas at Fayetteville, the Arkansas Economic Development Commission, and any other state agency, board, commission, department, institution, college, university, or authority shall make data, information, statistics, or other records of information available to the Department of Finance and Administration. Provided, however, that such information and records shall not identify persons, people, conglomerates, corporations, monopolies, or others that would from any published data or data within the possession of the office of the Secretary of the Department of Finance and Administration reveal the identity or any information or data of that particular identity that would be in conflict with federal laws.

History.

Acts 1989 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 247, § 20; 1997, No. 540, § 47; 2019, No. 910, § 3563.

A.C.R.C. Notes. Former §25-1-104, concerning access of Department of Finance and Administration to agency records, is deemed to be superseded by this section. The former section was derived from Acts 1987, No. 1051, § 22.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment substituted “Division of Workforce Services” for “Department of Workforce Services” near the beginning of the first sentence and substituted “Secretary” for “Director” in the last sentence.

25-1-105. [Repealed.]

Publisher's Notes. This section, concerning annual reports, was repealed in its entirety by Acts 2001, No. 221, § 6. The section was derived from Acts 1995, No. 1123, § 1; 1997, No. 181, § 1; 1999, No. 1164, § 182; 1999, No. 1222, § 16; 1999, No. 1323, §§ 50-52; 2001, No. 1800, § 18.

This section's repeal by Acts 2001, No. 221, § 6, was deemed by the Arkansas Code Revision Commission to supersede the amendments of this section by Acts 2001, No. 537, § 3; 2001, No. 783, § 6; 2001, No. 1185, § 4; and 2001, No. 1800, § 18. See §§1-2-207 and1-2-303.

25-1-106. Evaluation of necessity of various commissions and boards.

Any part-time state board or commission that has not convened a meeting or has convened without a quorum for two (2) consecutive, regularly scheduled meeting dates within a two-year period shall vote to elect a new chair and vice chair.

If a part-time state board or commission has not convened a regularly scheduled meeting or has convened without a quorum for four (4) consecutive, regularly scheduled meeting dates within a two-year period, the Joint Performance Review Committee shall reevaluate the purpose, need, and effectiveness of the board or commission.

The Joint Performance Review Committee shall report its findings and any recommendations concerning the existence of the board or commission to the Legislative Council no later than December 1 of each even-numbered year and shall draft legislation to implement the recommendations.

No later than August 1 of each even-numbered year, each part-time board and commission shall provide the Joint Performance Review Committee with a list of the regularly scheduled meeting dates for the board or commission for the previous two (2) fiscal years, including the attendance record of each member and the number of meetings that were convened.

After providing the opportunity for review and advice by the advisory bodies, the state administrative agency shall:

Establish a proposal activity calendar one hundred eighty (180) days prior to the start of the upcoming funding cycle;

Establish procedures and dates for review of subgrant funding applications for each funding cycle.

The state administrative agency shall provide copies of subgrant applications submitted for review to the chairperson of each relevant advisory body;

Establish, consistent with federal law, subgrant application forms;

Establish deadlines for receiving subgrant applications;

Establish dates of subgrant application technical assistance training sessions;

Establish subgrant applicant appeal process procedures; and

Develop a statewide victim service needs assessment and strategic plan for Victims of Crime Act, STOP Violence Against Women Act, and Family Violence Prevention and Services Act funds pursuant to applicable federal program guidelines; and

The state administrative agency shall meet with the relevant advisory bodies no later than thirty (30) days prior to the scheduled date of mailing of application forms for the purpose of providing an opportunity for review of the content of the application forms. The state administrative agency shall provide drafts of all necessary subgrant application forms to the chairperson of the relevant advisory boards prior to such a meeting.

The state administrative agency shall provide quarterly reports concerning subgrantee and administrative financial activity to the Governor and to the chairperson of each advisory body within ten (10) working days of the completion of the reports.

Within one hundred twenty (120) days following the start of a subgrant funding cycle, the state administrative agency shall meet with focus groups made up of those programs that or individuals who applied for funds through the Victims of Crime Act, STOP Violence Against Women Act, or Family Violence Prevention and Services Act grant programs in the most recent funding cycle. These meetings are for the purpose of evaluating the effectiveness and responsiveness of the application, application review, and funding recommendation process in order to maintain the integrity of those processes. The state administrative agency shall provide reports of these meetings to the Governor and to the chairperson of each advisory body within ten (10) working days of the completion of the meetings.

The amount of the grant;

The purpose of the grant;

The source of the grant;

Conditions of the grant; and

Any other information requested by the Legislative Council.

History.

Acts 1997, No. 1205, § 1; 1999, No. 1308, § 1; 2003, No. 1335, § 1.

25-1-107. Guidelines for advisory bodies.

Where advisory bodies are specified by state or federal legislation or guidelines to act in conjunction with the entity or organization designated to administer funds of the Victims of Crime Act, 42 U.S.C. §§ 10601 — 10605, the STOP Violence Against Women Act, 42 U.S.C. § 13701, and the Family Violence Prevention and Services Act, 42 U.S.C. § 10401 et seq., the duties and protocol of those advisory bodies, as well as responsibilities of the state administrative agency, shall include, but not be limited to, the following:

The state administrative agency shall make available to members of the advisory bodies, upon request, copies of current federal and state law and guidelines concerning the relevant Victims of Crime Act, STOP Violence Against Women Act, and Family Violence Prevention and Services Act programs, including any formal interpretations of such law and guidelines by the state administrative agency.

Any copies of forms, laws, guidelines, or interpretations required to be furnished by the state administrative agency must be made available on computer diskette or other requested electronic media if the requested item is feasibly able to be produced in the requested manner.

History.

Acts 1999, No. 1428, § 27; 2001, No. 1786, § 4.

25-1-108. Report.

For purposes of this section, “state agency” means every department, division, office, board, commission, and institution of this state, excluding state-supported institutions of higher education.

Every state agency that receives grants in excess of twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) from any source shall report to the Legislative Council within forty-five (45) calendar days after receipt of a grant.

The report shall include:

All state-supported institutions of higher education shall continue to report grants to the Department of Finance and Administration quarterly on forms prescribed by the department, and the department shall upon receipt thereof file the reports with the Legislative Council.

History.

Acts 2001, No. 319, § 1.

25-1-109. Televised public service announcements.

All state agencies that make televised public service announcements shall ensure that those announcements are either closed-captioned or open-captioned.

History.

Acts 2001, No. 813, § 1.

25-1-110. Cost-effectiveness of state-owned vehicles.

Each agency shall ensure that the purchase and continued ownership of state-owned vehicles is cost effective for the agency.

Each agency shall determine if the purchase or continued ownership of a vehicle is cost effective based upon a comparison between state vehicle ownership and private car mileage reimbursement break-even points, as established pursuant to rules promulgated by the Department of Finance and Administration.

The comparison shall be based upon the previous year's use of the state-owned vehicle.

On June 1 of every year, each agency shall provide the department a report including:

The number of agency vehicles;

The mileage used on the agency vehicles;

Any private car mileage reimbursements; and

Justification for retention of all vehicles identified as under-utilized.

By September 1 of each year, the department shall provide each agency and the Legislative Council with recommendations concerning the continued ownership of state-owned vehicles by each agency.

The provisions of this section do not apply to institutions of higher education and vocational technical institutes.

Amendments. The 2009 amendment inserted “the Arkansas Lottery Commission” in (e) and made a related change.

The 2015 amendment deleted “the Arkansas Lottery Commission” in (e).

The 2019 amendment substituted “rules” for “regulations” in (b)(1).

The state agency designated by the Governor under this section shall not disburse Family Violence Prevention and Services Act funds without providing an opportunity for review of and advice concerning grant processes and grant funding by the Grant Advisory Board.

The state agency designated by the Governor under this section shall, after the review and recommendations of the Grant Advisory Board, promulgate rules consistent with federal law setting forth the policies and procedures for the administration and disbursement of Victims of Crime Act, STOP Violence Against Women Act, and Family Violence Prevention and Services Act funds, including policies and procedures for the participation and assistance of advisory bodies established to assist potential beneficiaries of those funds.

As used in this section, “review” means an analysis, evaluation, assessment, appraisal, inquiry, inspection, or a study.

“Review” does not mean the authority utilized by the General Assembly in its analysis of proposed rules or appropriations.

Amendments. The 2017 amendment substituted “the Grant Advisory Board” for “and other advisory bodies established to assist potential beneficiaries of those funds” at the end of (b); inserted (c) and redesignated the remaining subsections accordingly; rewrote (d) through (f); in (g), inserted “after the review and recommendations of the Grant Advisory Board” and deleted “and regulations” following “rules”; and added (h).

U.S. Code. 42 U.S.C. §§ 10601—10605, referred to in subsection (a) of this section, are now codified as 34 U.S.C. § 20101 et seq.

The STOP Violence Against Women Act, referred to in this section, may refer to the Violence Against Women Act of 1994, which was passed as title IV of the Violent Crime Control and Law Enforcement Act of 1994, Pub. L. No. 103-322, and is codified in various sections of the U.S. Code. Concerning grants related to violent crimes against women, see 34 U.S.C. § 10441 et seq., 34 U.S.C. § 12291 et seq.

History.

Acts 2001, No. 1711, § 1; 2009, No. 1405, § 49; 2015, No. 218, § 26; 2019, No. 315, § 2905.

25-1-111. Designation — Grant Advisory Board — Definition.

The Governor shall have the authority to designate the state agency responsible for the administration and disbursement of funds received by the State of Arkansas under the Victims of Crime Act, 42 U.S.C. §§ 10601 — 10605, the STOP Violence Against Women Act, 42 U.S.C. § 13701, and the Family Violence Prevention and Services Act, 42 U.S.C. § 10401 et seq., in the manner authorized by federal law.

The state agency designated by the Governor under this section shall not disburse Victims of Crime Act, STOP Violence Against Women Act, or Family Violence Prevention and Services Act funds without providing an opportunity for subgrantee qualification selection assistance and programmatic support by the Arkansas Child Abuse/Rape/Domestic Violence Commission and the Grant Advisory Board.

(1)The Grant Advisory Board is established under this section to assist potential beneficiaries of Victims of Crime Act, STOP Violence Against Women Act, or Family Violence Prevention and Services Act funds by:

(i)Providing review and advice concerning grant processes and grant funding.

If a member of the Grant Advisory Board has a financial interest in an organization seeking grant funding under subdivision (c)(1)(A)(i) of this section, the member may participate in discussion regarding the award of the grant, but the member shall not vote on the matter;

Hearing grievances from the beneficiaries of those funds; and

After Grant Advisory Board review, requiring the state agency to provide timely notification to the Grant Advisory Board of any revisions to existing rules and any proposed rules to be promulgated, within federal guidelines, by the state agency designated by the Governor under this section, concerning Victims of Crime Act, STOP Violence Against Women Act, or Family Violence Prevention and Services Act funds, and any applicable policies and procedures.

The Grant Advisory Board shall consist of:

Two (2) representatives selected by the Arkansas Coalition Against Sexual Assault;

Two (2) representatives selected by the Arkansas Coalition Against Domestic Violence;

Two (2) representatives selected by the Arkansas State CASA Association;

Two (2) representatives selected by the Prosecution Coordination Commission;

One (1) representative selected by the Criminal Justice Institute Advisory Board for Law Enforcement Management Training and Education; and

One (1) representative each from any other advisory body determined to be necessary by the state administrative agency, including without limitation, the elderly, non-English-speaking residents, disabled persons, members of racial or ethnic minorities, and residents of rural or remote areas.

The state agency designated by the Governor under this section shall not disburse Victims of Crime Act funds without providing an opportunity for review of and advice concerning grant processes and grant funding by the Grant Advisory Board.

(1)The state agency designated by the Governor under this section shall not disburse funds under the law enforcement, prosecution, and judiciary percentages of the STOP Violence Against Women Act, without providing an opportunity for review of and advice concerning grant processes and grant funding by the Grant Advisory Board.

The state agency designated by the Governor under this section shall not disburse funds under the victims services and discretionary percentages of the STOP Violence Against Women Act without providing an opportunity for review of and advice concerning grant processes and grant funding by the Grant Advisory Board.

History.

Acts 2001, No. 1786, § 1; 2017, No. 777, § 1.

25-1-112. Sexual offenses screened in criminal background checks.

Whenever a criminal background check is performed on a person under the provisions of any criminal background check requirement contained in this Code for employment, licensure, or any other purpose, the person may be disqualified for employment, licensure, or any other purpose for which the background check was conducted if it is determined that the person committed a violation of any sexual offense formerly proscribed under §§5-14-101 —5-14-103,5-14-104 —5-14-109 [repealed],5-14-110 —5-14-112,5-14-113 —5-14-119 [reserved],5-14-120 —5-14-121 [repealed], and5-14-122 —5-14-127, that is substantially equivalent to any sexual offense presently listed in §§5-14-101 —5-14-103,5-14-104 —5-14-109 [repealed],5-14-110 —5-14-112,5-14-113 —5-14-119 [reserved],5-14-120 —5-14-121 [repealed], and5-14-122 —5-14-127, and is an offense screened for in a criminal background check.

History.

Acts 2003, No. 1393, § 1.